Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As an integral part of the  health education curriculum for students in the
public schools of this state, each school district must  provide age-appropriate instruction in
oral health.
SECTION 2. (1) Section 1 of this 2021 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2025.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding the operative date set  forth in subsection (1) of this section, the
State Board of Education, no later than September 1, 2024, shall adopt any  health education
content standards necessary to  enable school district compliance with the requirements of
section 1 of this 2021 Act. The standards  shall prescribe the grades in which instruction in
oral health is provided to students.
(b) For the purpose of  adopting health education content standards as provided by para-
graph (a) of this subsection, the board shall consult with:
(A) Dental health professionals who have experience working  in public health and with
children; and
(B) The dental director  appointed by the Oregon Health Authority, or the director’s
designee.
(3)(a) A school district must first offer instruction that meets the health  education con-
tent standards adopted under subsection (2) of this section no later than  the 2025-2026 school
year.
(b) Nothing in paragraph (a) of this subsection prevents a school district from first of-
fering instruction that meets the requirements of section 1 of  this 2021 Act at any time be-
fore the school year set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 3. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Coordinated care organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Global budget” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may  not reduce a global budget or deny reimbursement
for the costs claimed by a coordinated care organization to provide care coordination  or
other social services relating to improving access for students to school-based oral health
services.
Enrolled House Bill 2969 (HB 2969-A) Page 1
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House April 27, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 27, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2969 (HB 2969-A) Page 2